Utah statutes.
31A-22-1810.   Applicability.

This part is not applicable to a loan or lease originated by a federally insured depository institution, or a subsidiary or affiliate of a federally insured depository institution, or originated by any other entity as part of a plan to sell or assign an interest in the loan or lease to a federally insured depository institution, or a subsidiary or affiliate of a federally insured depository institution.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2012 General Session

